Connecticut, session 2026, SB00191.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 17a-484g of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "MDMA" means the synthetic psychoactive drug, 3,4-
methylenedioxymethamphetamine, commonly known as ecstasy or
molly, that acts as a serotonin receptor agonist and reuptake inhibitor of
serotonin and dopamine.
(2) "Psilocybin" means a serotonin receptor agonist that occurs
naturally in some mushroom species.
(3) "Qualified patient" means an individual who is eighteen years of
age or older and meets clinical eligibility criteria established by the
institutional review board of the medical school selected to administer
the pilot program under subsection (b) of this section, including, but not
limited to, a resident of the state who is (A) a veteran, (B) a retired first
responder, or (C) a direct care health care worker.

Senate Bill No. 191
(b) [Not later than January 1, 2023, the] The Department of Mental
Health and Addiction Services shall establish, within available
appropriations, a psychedelic-assisted therapy pilot program, to be
administered by a medical school in the state. Such pilot program shall
provide qualified patients with MDMA-assisted or psilocybin-assisted
therapy as part of a research program approved by the federal Food and
Drug Administration pursuant to 21 CFR 312, as amended from time to
time. [The department shall cease to operate the pilot program when
MDMA and psilocybin have been approved to have a medical use by
the Drug Enforcement Administration, or any successor agency.]
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-108 2 of 2